Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1536
Bribery; prohibited acts; penalty.

(1) Any person who accepts or receives any valuable thing as a consideration for his or her vote for any person to be voted for at any election shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

(2) Any person who, by bribery, attempts to influence any voter of this state in voting, uses any threat to procure any voter to vote contrary to the inclination of such voter, or deters any voter from voting shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 435.